Utah statutes.
67-5-27.   Real estate fraud prosecutor.

(1)  The state attorney general shall employ an attorney licensed to practice law in Utah who:

(a)  has knowledge of the law related to mortgage fraud; and

(b)  preferably also has background or expertise in investigating and prosecuting mortgage fraud.

(2)  The primary responsibility of the attorney employed under Subsection (1) is the prosecution of real estate fraud.

(3)  The state attorney general may employ clerks, interns, or other personnel as necessary to assist the attorney employed under Subsection (1).

